test/src/morphology/N-siom_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - siõm a-stem: # Noun 'rifle' - full paradigm
     siõm+N+Sg+Nom: siõm
     siõm+N+Sg+Gen: siõmmân
     siõm+N+Sg+Acc: siõmmân
     siõm+N+Sg+Ill: siõmmna
     siõm+N+Sg+Loc: siõmmnest
     siõm+N+Sg+Com: siõmmnin
     siõm+N+Ess: siõmmnen
     siõm+N+Par: siõmmned
     siõm+N+Sg+Abe: siõmmântää
     siõm+N+Pl+Nom: siõmmân
     siõm+N+Pl+Gen: siõmmni
     siõm+N+Pl+Acc: siõmmnid
     siõm+N+Pl+Ill: siõmmnid
     siõm+N+Pl+Loc: siõmmnin
     siõm+N+Pl+Com: siõmmnivuiˊm
     siõm+N+Pl+Abe: siõmmnitää
